District of Columbia statutes.
47-828

Violations of assessment provisions.

Any person who shall refuse or knowingly neglect to perform any duty enjoined on him by law, or who shall consent to or connive at any evasion of the provision of the first section of the Act of March 3, 1881 (§ 47-211), or § 13 of the Act of August 14, 1894 (§ 47-602), or any other provision of this chapter shall, for each offense, be removed from office and fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01], or imprisoned for no longer than 1 year, or both, in the discretion of the court.

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1057, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 429
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(d), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 47-828.
1973 Ed., § 47-649.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $10,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(d) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
“The 1st section of the Act of March 3, 1881 (§ 47-211),” referred to in this section, appears identical with the original. However, the citation to § 47-211 appears to be erroneous, as that section is based on § 14 of 28 Stat. 285, approved August 14, 1894, rather than the 1881 Act.
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.